Indiana, session 2026, SB77.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Indiana:
SECTION 1. IC 20-26-7.1-3, AS AMENDED BY P.L.36-2024,
SECTION 4, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 3. (a) Except as provided in section 1 of this
chapter or subsection (b), (c), or (d), and subject to the requirements
of section 3.5 of this chapter, before a governing body may sell,
exchange, lease, demolish, hold without operating, or dispose of a
covered school building, a governing body shall make available for
lease or purchase by a charter school or state educational institution
any covered school building owned by the school corporation or any
other entity that is related in any way to, or created by, the school
corporation or the governing body, including a building corporation,
that the governing body elects to close or the school corporation is
required to close under IC 20-26-7-47, in order for the covered school
building to be used by a:
(1) charter school to conduct prekindergarten through grade 12
classroom instruction; or
(2) state educational institution for an academic purpose.
2026 IN 77—LS 6393/DI 152


(b) The following are not required to comply with this chapter:
(1) A governing body that vacates a covered school building in
order to:
(A) renovate the covered school building for a future
allowable use by the school corporation as permitted under
IC 20-26-7-47; or
(B) demolish the covered school building, in whole or part,
and build a new school building or an addition to a school
building on the same site as the demolished building.
(2) An emergency manager of a distressed school corporation
under IC 6-1.1-20.3.
(3) The governing body of the School City of East Chicago school
corporation for the Carrie Gosch Elementary School building.
(4) A school corporation that has had a designation as a distressed
political subdivision under IC 6-1.1-20.3 within the previous three
(3) years.
(c) This section does not apply to a covered school building in
which a governing body under IC 20-26-5-4(a)(7) entered a lease prior
to January 1, 2019, with a state accredited nonpublic school. In
addition, the governing body may, during or at the expiration of the
term of such lease, sell the school building leased under
IC 20-26-5-4(a)(7) to the nonpublic school at a purchase price mutually
agreed to by the governing body and the nonpublic school.
(d) This section does not apply to a covered school building of a
school corporation to which the following apply:
(1) The school corporation had, before January 1, 2023, entered
into a lease or memorandum of understanding with a nonprofit
organization exempt from federal taxation under Section
501(c)(3) through 501(c)(7) of the Internal Revenue Code for the
use of the covered school building.
(2) The lease or memorandum of understanding described in
subdivision (1):
(A) continues in effect;
(B) is renewed; or
(C) is replaced by a new lease or memorandum of
understanding that is entered into between the school
corporation and the nonprofit organization described in
subdivision (1).
(3) The nonprofit organization described in subdivision (1) uses
the covered school building for an educational purpose
throughout the term of any lease or memorandum of
understanding.
2026 IN 77—LS 6393/DI 152


If at any time the conditions under subdivisions (2) and (3) are not met,
the covered school building is subject to IC 20-26-7-47 and this
chapter.
(e) A covered school building that a school corporation closes or is
required to close may not be retained by the school corporation for
storage or office use unless the conditions of IC 20-26-7-47(e)(3),
IC 20-26-7-47(e)(4), or IC 20-26-7-47(e)(5) are met.
SECTION 2. IC 20-26-7.1-3.5 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA
CODE AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 3.5. (a) Before a governing body
of a school corporation located in a county with a population of less
than one hundred fifty thousand (150,000) may sell, exchange,
lease, demolish, hold without operating, or dispose of a covered
school building, a governing body shall make available for
purchase by the county or municipal government in which the
school corporation is located any covered school building owned by
the school corporation or any other entity that is related in any
way to, or created by, the school corporation or the governing
body, including a building corporation, that the governing body
elects to close or the school corporation is required to close under
IC 20-26-7-47.
(b) A governing body described in subsection (a) shall have one
(1) year from the date the governing body determines at a public
meeting to cease using a covered school building for classroom
instruction on student instructional days (as described in
IC 20-30-2-2) for a school year as required under IC 20-30-2-3 to
sell a covered building described in subsection (a) at a purchase
price mutually agreed to by the parties.
(c) If a sale described in subsection (b) is not made within the
one (1) year period set forth in subsection (b), the governing body
shall make the covered school building available for lease or
purchase by a charter school or state educational institution in the
manner described in section 3 of this chapter.
SECTION 3. IC 20-26-7.1-4, AS AMENDED BY P.L.1-2025,
SECTION 188, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 4. (a) This section does not apply
to a governing body that sold a covered school building to a county
or municipal government under section 3.5 of this chapter.
(a) (b) Not later than:
(1) thirty (30) days after the date a governing body of a school
corporation located in a county with a population of at least
one hundred fifty thousand (150,000); or
2026 IN 77—LS 6393/DI 152


(2) thirteen (13) months after the date a governing body of a
school corporation located in a county with a population of
less than one hundred fifty thousand (150,000);
determines at a public meeting to cease using a covered school building
for classroom instruction on student instructional days (as described in
IC 20-30-2-2) for a school year as required under IC 20-30-2-3, a
school corporation shall provide written notice to the department
regarding the date that the covered school building has ceased or will
cease being used for classroom instruction as described in this
subsection.
(b) (c) If the school corporation does not intend to make a covered
school building available for lease or purchase in accordance with this
chapter, the school corporation shall state in the notice required under
subsection (a) (b) the factual and legal basis for the school
corporation's contention that the covered school building is not
required to be made available under this chapter. Any claim for
exclusion from a requirement to make the covered school building
available under this chapter which is not stated in the notice under this
subsection is waived.
(c) (d) If a school corporation does not provide notice to the
department under subsection (a), (b), any claim for exclusion from a
requirement to make the covered school building available under this
chapter is waived.
(d) (e) Not later than fifteen (15) days after the date that the
department receives a notice from a school corporation under
subsection (a), (b), the department shall provide written notice to all
interested persons regarding the notice from the school corporation
submitted under subsection (a). (b).
(e) (f) If a notice from a school corporation under subsection (a) (b)
acknowledges that the covered school building will be made available
in accordance with this chapter, the department's notice to interested
persons shall provide that any notice of interest by an interested person
for the covered school building must be submitted to the department
not later than sixty (60) days after the date the interested person
receives the department's notice under subsection (d). (e).
(f) (g) If a notice from a school corporation under subsection (a) (b)
includes a claim that the covered school building will not be made
available under this chapter, an interested person may submit to the
department, not later than thirty (30) days after the date the interested
person receives the notice from the department under subsection (d),
(e), a rebuttal to the factual and legal basis for the school corporation's
contention that the covered school building is not required to be made
2026 IN 77—LS 6393/DI 152


available under this chapter.
(g) (h) The department shall, not later than sixty (60) days after the
date that a rebuttal is due under subsection (f), (g), issue a
determination to the school corporation and interested persons as to
whether the covered school building must be made available under this
chapter. The department shall publish a copy of the department's
determination on the department's website.
(h) (i) Not later than thirty (30) days after the date that the
department issues a determination under subsection (g), (h), a school
corporation or interested person may appeal the determination to the
state board. An appeal to the state board shall be subject to the
procedure described in IC 20-26-11-15(b).
(i) (j) Not later than fifteen (15) days after:
(1) the time expires for an appeal to the state board of a
department determination under subsection (g) (h) or
IC 20-26-7-47 that a covered school building be made available;
or
(2) a determination by the state board that a covered school
building is to be made available is issued;
the governing body shall take the actions specified by subsection (j).
(k). If the governing body fails to take the actions, the department shall
request that the attorney general enforce the order under section 9(a)
of this chapter.
(j) (k) If a covered school building is to be made available, the
governing body shall do the following:
(1) Make the covered school building available for inspection by
a charter school or state educational institution that notifies the
department that it is interested in leasing or purchasing the
covered school building.
(2) Make the following information available to a charter school
or state educational institution described in subdivision (1):
(A) Estimates of the operating expenses for the covered school
building for the past three (3) years.
(B) Written information regarding the condition of the covered
school building, including the age of the roof and the HVAC
system, and any known conditions which, in the governing
body's opinion, require prompt repair or replacement.
(C) A legal description of the property.
(k) (l) If the governing body fails to take the actions required under
subsection (j), (k), a charter school having notified the school
corporation of its interest in the covered school building is entitled to
an injunction requiring the governing body to take the actions under
2026 IN 77—LS 6393/DI 152


subsection (j). (k).
(l) (m) The school corporation shall lease the covered school
building to a charter school or state educational institution for one
dollar ($1) per year for as long as the state educational institution uses
the covered school building for an academic purpose or the charter
school uses the covered school building for classroom instruction, for
a term at the state educational institution's or charter school's
discretion, or sell the covered school building for one dollar ($1), if the
charter school or state educational institution does the following:
(1) Within ninety (90) days of receiving the department's notice
under subsection (d), (e), a charter school or state educational
institution must submit a preliminary request to purchase or lease
the covered school building.
(2) Subject to subsection (m), (n), within ninety (90) days of
receiving the department's notice under subsection (d), (e), a
charter school or state educational institution must submit to the
school corporation the following information:
(A) The name of the charter school or state educational
institution that is interested in leasing or purchasing the
covered school building.
(B) A time frame, which may not exceed three (3) years from
the date that the covered school building is to be closed, no
longer used, or no longer occupied, in which the:
(i) charter school intends to begin providing classroom
instruction in the covered school building; or
(ii) state educational institution intends to begin using the
covered school building for an academic purpose.
(C) A resolution, adopted by the board of the charter school or
state educational institution stating that the board of the
charter school or state educational institution has determined
that, after the charter school or state educational institution has
made any necessary repairs or modifications, the covered
school building will be sufficient to meet the charter school's
or state educational institution's needs and can be operated
within the charter school's or state educational institution's
budget.
(m) (n) If the department does not receive any preliminary requests
to purchase or lease a covered school building within the time frame
described in subsection (l)(1), (m)(1), the department shall send
notification to the school corporation that the department has not
received any preliminary requests to purchase or lease the covered
school building. Upon receipt of the notification under this subsection,
2026 IN 77—LS 6393/DI 152


the school corporation may sell or otherwise dispose of the covered
school building in accordance with IC 36-1-11, IC 20-25-4-14, and
IC 20-26-5-4(a)(7).
(n) (o) If only one (1) charter school submits a preliminary request
to purchase or lease the covered school building, the department shall
notify the school corporation of the identity of the charter school and
direct the school corporation to complete a sale or lease to the charter
school in accordance with subsection (r). (s). In the event that two (2)
or more charter schools submit a preliminary request to purchase or
lease a covered school building within the time frame described in
subsection (l)(1), (m)(1), the department shall send notification to each
interested person and the school corporation that the department has
received two (2) or more preliminary requests under this section. An
authorizer committee shall be established, with each statewide
authorizer that has authorized one (1) or more charter schools
appointing a representative, and the committee shall establish the
chairperson and procedures for the committee. Within sixty (60) days
of receiving notice under this subsection, the committee shall select
which charter school may proceed under subsection (r) (s) to purchase
or lease the covered school building or determine if two (2) or more
charter schools should co-locate within the covered school building.
The committee shall base the committee's decision on the following
criteria:
(1) Preference shall be given to existing charter schools that have
a proven track record of student academic performance.
(2) If two (2) or more charter schools of proven academic
performance are competing and only one (1) charter school is
operating in the county in which the covered school building is
located, the charter school in the same county as the covered
school building shall be given preference.
In the event that the committee determines that two (2) or more charter
schools should co-locate in the covered school building, the charter
schools have sixty (60) days to submit a memorandum of
understanding stating that the charter schools shall be jointly and
severally liable for the obligations related to the sale or lease of the
covered school building, and specifying how the charter schools will
utilize the covered school building and share responsibility for
operational, maintenance, and renovation expenses. If the charter
schools are unable to agree, the charter schools shall be deemed to have
revoked their prior request regarding the lease or sale of the covered
school building. The committee shall give notice of the committee's
decision to the school corporation and each interested person. A charter
2026 IN 77—LS 6393/DI 152


school that is not selected by the committee may appeal the decision to
the state board not more than thirty (30) days after receipt of the
committee's decision. The state board shall issue a final order in the
appeal not more than sixty (60) days after receipt of a properly filed
appeal. Notice of the appeal and the final order in the appeal must be
given to the school corporation.
(o) (p) If a charter school does not submit a preliminary request to
purchase or lease the covered school building and only one (1) state
educational institution submits a preliminary request to purchase or
lease the covered school building, the department shall:
(1) notify the school corporation of the identity of the state
educational institution; and
(2) direct the school corporation to complete a sale or lease to the
state educational institution in accordance with subsection (r). (s).
(p) (q) If one (1) or more state educational institutions submit
preliminary requests to purchase or lease a covered school building, a
selection committee shall be established consisting of one (1) member
appointed by the executive of the largest city or town in the county in
which the covered school building is located, one (1) member
appointed by the city or town council of the largest city or town in the
county in which the covered school building is located, one (1) member
appointed by the county commissioners of the county in which the
covered school building is located, one (1) member appointed by the
county council of the county in which the covered school building is
located, and one (1) member appointed by the chamber of commerce
of the county in which the covered school building is located.
(q) (r) Not later than sixty (60) days after the date that a member is
appointed under subsection (p), (q), the committee shall:
(1) select which state educational institution may proceed to
purchase or lease the covered school building; or
(2) determine whether more than one (1) state educational
institution should co-locate within the covered school building.
In making the committee's determination, the committee shall give
preference to a state educational institution whose proposed use of the
covered school building is assessed as having the greatest educational
benefit for prekindergarten through grade 12 education. A committee
determination under this subsection may not be appealed.
(r) (s) A school corporation shall lease the covered school building
for one dollar ($1) per year to the charter school or state educational
institution for as long as the:
(1) charter school uses the covered school building for classroom
instruction for any combination of kindergarten through grade 12;
2026 IN 77—LS 6393/DI 152


or
(2) state educational institution uses the covered school building
for an academic purpose.
The term of the lease shall be established at the charter school's or state
educational institution's discretion and include an option for the state
educational institution or charter school to purchase the covered school
building for one dollar ($1). Alternatively, the school corporation shall
sell the covered school building to the charter school or state
educational institution for one dollar ($1), if the charter school or state
educational institution has met the requirements set forth in subsection
(l) (m) and uses the covered school building in the manner prescribed
by this subsection. If the charter school or state educational institution
selected to lease or purchase the covered school building has met the
requirements under subsection (l), (m), the school corporation has not
more than ninety (90) days after the date notice of a final unappealable
decision is received by the school corporation to complete the lease or
sale of the covered school building to the charter school or state
educational institution. If the transaction is not completed within ninety
(90) days, the department or the selected charter school or state
educational institution may, under section 9 of this chapter, request that
the attorney general enforce the sale or lease or may file suit to enforce
the sale or lease. If a charter school or state educational institution has
not met the requirements under subsection (l), (m), the school
corporation may sell or otherwise dispose of the covered school
building in accordance with IC 36-1-11, IC 20-25-4-14, and
IC 20-26-5-4(a)(7).
SECTION 4. IC 20-26-7.1-4.5, AS AMENDED BY P.L.189-2023,
SECTION 17, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 4.5. (a) After a governing body passes a resolution
or takes official action to close, no longer use, or no longer occupy a
covered school building or the covered school building is required to
be closed under IC 20-26-7-47, a school corporation is responsible for
meeting the requirements described in subsection (b) until the
applicable covered school building is:
(1) sold or leased to a charter school or state educational
institution; or
(2) sold to a county or municipal government under section
3.5 of this chapter; or
(2) (3) eligible to be sold or otherwise disposed in accordance
with IC 36-1-11, IC 20-25-4-14, and IC 20-26-5-4(a)(7).
(b) During the period described in subsection (a), a school
corporation is:
2026 IN 77—LS 6393/DI 152


(1) responsible for the maintenance of a covered school building,
including:
(A) protection against theft or vandalism;
(B) fire protection; and
(C) ensuring the covered school building is not damaged
during adverse weather conditions;
(2) responsible for maintaining the physical condition of the
covered school building in the same physical condition the
applicable covered school building was on the last day that it was
used for classroom instruction; and
(3) financially responsible for any damage or destruction that
occurs to the covered school building.
SECTION 5. IC 20-26-7.1-5, AS AMENDED BY P.L.135-2025,
SECTION 7, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 5. (a) If:
(1) a covered school building is sold to a charter school or state
educational institution under section 4 of this chapter; and
(2) the charter school or state educational institution described in
subdivision (1) no longer intends to use the covered school
building for the purposes described in section 4(l) 4(m) of this
chapter;
the charter school or state educational institution shall offer to transfer
the covered school building back to the school corporation that initially
sold the covered school building to the charter school or state
educational institution.
(b) If a school corporation described in subsection (a) declines the
offer to transfer a covered school building back to the school
corporation, the charter school or state educational institution may sell
or transfer the covered school building to a third party. If a charter
school or state educational institution sells or transfers a covered
school building to a third party under this subsection, the charter school
or state educational institution must transfer an amount equal to the
gain in the property minus the adjusted basis (including costs of
improvements to the covered school building) to the school corporation
that initially sold the covered school building to the charter school or
state educational institution. Gain and adjusted basis shall be
determined in the manner prescribed by the Internal Revenue Code and
the applicable Internal Revenue Service regulations and guidelines.
(c) A charter school or state educational institution that purchases
a covered school building assumes total control of the covered school
building and must maintain the covered school building, including
utilities, insurance, maintenance, and repairs. Except as provided in
2026 IN 77—LS 6393/DI 152


subsection (d), in the event a:
(1) charter school does not use the covered school building for
classroom instruction; or
(2) state educational institution does not use the covered school
building for an academic purpose;
within two (2) years after acquiring the covered school building, the
covered school building shall revert to the school corporation, which
may sell or otherwise dispose of the covered school building under
IC 36-1-11.
(d) In the event a:
(1) charter school does not use the covered school building for
classroom instruction; or
(2) state educational institution does not use the covered school
building for an academic purpose;
as a result of being engaged in ongoing renovations for an acquired
covered school building, within two (2) years after acquiring an
occupancy permit for the covered school building, the covered school
building shall revert to the school corporation, which may sell or
otherwise dispose of the covered school building under IC 36-1-11.
SECTION 6. IC 20-26-7.1-5.3, AS AMENDED BY P.L.36-2024,
SECTION 7, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 5.3. (a) This section applies to a covered school
building to which the following apply:
(1) The covered school building was purchased or leased by a
charter school under section 4 of this chapter.
(2) The total student enrollment for in-person instruction in the
school building in the current school year is at least ten percent
(10%) less than the student enrollment for in-person instruction
in the school building in a school year that precedes the current
school year by five (5).
(b) A school corporation may not petition the department under
subsection (c) within the first five (5) years after a charter school
purchased or initially leased a covered school building under this
chapter.
(c) Subject to subsection (f), if the number of full-time equivalent
students enrolled for in-person instruction in a school building on
instructional days (as determined under IC 20-30-2) for instructional
purposes for a school year is not at least fifty percent (50%) of the
classroom design capacity of the school building, the school
corporation that leased or sold the school building to the charter school
may file a petition with the department requesting that the charter
school transfer the school building back to the school corporation.
2026 IN 77—LS 6393/DI 152


(d) Before filing a petition under subsection (c), the school
corporation must give written notice to the charter school to determine
whether an agreement can be reached regarding transferring the school
building to the school corporation.
(e) A petition filed under this section is subject to the same
procedures under IC 20-26-7-47 as a petition filed under
IC 20-26-7-47(h).
(f) For purposes of determining classroom design capacity under
subsection (c), if a charter school reconfigures a school building after
the charter school leases or purchases the school building, the
classroom design capacity must be determined based on the
reconfigured school building and not the classroom design capacity of
the school building at the time of the lease or purchase.
2026 IN 77—LS 6393/DI 152